Hawaii statutes.
PART VII.
JUVENILE CRIME PREVENTION BUREAU

§571-71 Juvenile crime prevention bureau;
establishment of. Any chief of police may establish as a subdivision of
the police department under the chief's jurisdiction a juvenile crime
prevention bureau, to be maintained and conducted as hereinafter provided. [L
1965, c 232, pt of §1; Supp, §333-32; HRS §571-71; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next